Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-12] Federal write-in absentee
ballot. A covered voter may use a
federal write-in absentee ballot to vote for all offices and ballot measures in
an election described in section 15D-3. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next